Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5553.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. (1) A person described in section 1 is granted the right to condemn property by eminent domain and the use of the highways in this state to acquire necessary rights-of-way for any of the following purposes: (a) To transport crude oil or petroleum. or carbon dioxide substances. (b) To locate, lay, construct, maintain, and operate pipelines for the purposes of subdivision (a). (2) Condemnation proceedings under subsection (1) shall must be conducted as provided in the uniform condemnation procedures act, 1980 PA 87, MCL 213.51 to 213.75.